Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 2. Environmental Impact Reports of State Agencies.

§ 10.1-1188.
State agencies to submit environmental impact reports on major projects.

All state agencies, boards, authorities and commissions or any branch of the state government shall prepare and submit an environmental impact report to the Department on each major state project.“Major state project” means the acquisition of an interest in land for any state facility construction, or the construction of any facility or expansion of an existing facility which is hereafter undertaken by any state agency, board, commission, authority or any branch of state government, including public institutions of higher education, which costs $500,000 or more. For the purposes of this chapter, authority shall not include any industrial development authority created pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 49 (§

15.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 15.2 or Chapter 643, as amended, of the 1964 Acts of Assembly. Nor shall it include the Virginia Port Authority created pursuant to the provisions of § 62.1-128, unless such project is a capital project that costs in excess of $5 million. Nor shall authority include any housing development or redevelopment authority established pursuant to state law. For the purposes of this chapter, branch of state government shall include any county, city or town of the Commonwealth only in connection with highway construction, reconstruction, or improvement projects affecting highways or roads undertaken by the county, city, or town on projects estimated to cost more than $2 million. For projects undertaken by any locality costing more than $500,000 and less than $2 million, the locality shall consult with the Department of Historic Resources to consider and make reasonable efforts to avoid or minimize impacts to historic resources if the project involves a new location or a new disturbance that extends outside the area or depth of a prior disturbance, or otherwise has the potential to affect such resources adversely.Such environmental impact report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The environmental impact of the major state project, including the impact on wildlife habitat;

Any adverse environmental effects which cannot be avoided if the major state project is undertaken;

Measures proposed to minimize the impact of the major state project;

Any alternatives to the proposed construction; and

Any irreversible environmental changes which would be involved in the major state project.For the purposes of subdivision 4, the report shall contain all alternatives considered and the reasons why the alternatives were rejected. If a report does not set forth alternatives, it shall state why alternatives were not considered.

For purposes of this chapter, this subsection shall only apply to the review of highway and road construction projects or any part thereof. The Secretaries of Transportation and Natural and Historic Resources shall jointly establish procedures for review and comment by state natural and historic resource agencies of highway and road construction projects. Such procedures shall provide for review and comment on appropriate projects and categories of projects to address the environmental impact of the project, any adverse environmental effects which cannot be avoided if the project is undertaken, the measures proposed to minimize the impact of the project, any alternatives to the proposed construction, and any irreversible environmental changes which would be involved in the project.

History.

1973, c. 384, § 10-17.108; 1974, c. 270, § 10.1-1208; 1977, c. 667; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 289; 1992, c. 887; 1997, c. 268; 2007, c. 896; 2008, cc. 45, 225, 473; 2012, cc. 846, 849; 2013, c. 758; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

Cross references.

For requirement that state agencies in preparing their reports, and the Department of Environmental Quality in conducting its review, consider the impact of projects on prime agricultural land, see § 3.2-204.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 846 and 849, cl. 3 provides: “That the Office of the Governor shall report to the General Assembly on recommendations regarding the establishment of an economic development zone and incentives to attract the distribution, manufacturing, warehousing, intermodal, and other support facilities needed for the Port of Virginia to realize the projected growth spanning from the Panama Canal Expansion Project. Such recommendations shall focus on implementing an economic development zone and incentive program comparable to those offered in states with competing ports. The recommendations shall be provided to the Chairmen of the House Appropriations Committee, the House Transportation Committee, the Senate Finance Committee, and the Senate Transportation Committee not later than December 1, 2012.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “public institutions of higher education” was substituted for “state-supported institutions of higher learning” in the definition of “Major state project” in subsection A to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 1997 amendment

inserted “including the impact on wildlife habitat” at the end of subdivision A 1.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 896 substituted “apply to” for “not include” and inserted “only in connection with highway construction, reconstruction, or improvement projects affecting highways or roads undertaken by the county, city, or town” in the last sentence in the definition of “Major state project”; and substituted “only” for “not” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 45 and 473 are almost identical, and added “on projects estimated to cost more than $500,000” to the end of the second paragraph in subsection A. In addition, c. 45 substituted “include” for “apply to” in the same definition.

The 2008 amendment by c. 225 substituted “$500,000” for “$100,000” in the first sentence of the definition of “Major state project” in subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 846 and 849 are identical, and in subsection A, added the present third sentence of the second paragraph, and deleted “of this subsection” following “subdivision 4” in the concluding paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 758, in the paragraph defining “Major state project” in subsection A, substituted “$2 million” for “$500,000” at the end of the fifth sentence and added the sixth sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic” in subsection B.

Law Review.

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

For annual survey article, see “Environmental Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 423 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 5.

§ 10.1-1188.1.
Department of Transportation to consider wildlife corridors.

The Department of Transportation (VDOT) shall, as part of the environmental review it conducts for a road or highway construction project, include in an environmental impact statement a list of any existing terrestrial or aquatic wildlife corridor identified in the Wildlife Corridor Action Plan (the Plan) created pursuant to Article 8 (§ 29.1-578 et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 29.1 that will be affected by such construction project. In the design options for any road or highway construction project that threatens wildlife connectivity in a corridor identified in the Plan, VDOT shall consider measures for the mitigation of harm caused by such road to terrestrial and aquatic wildlife.

History.

2020, cc. 323, 672.

§ 10.1-1189.
Department to review report and make statement to Governor.

Within sixty days of the receipt of the environmental impact report by the Department, the Department shall review and make a statement to the Governor commenting on the environmental impact of each major state facility. The statement of the Department shall be available to the General Assembly and to the general public at the time of submission by the Department to the Governor.

History.

1973, c. 384, § 10-17.109; 1974, c. 270, § 10.1-1209; 1977, c. 667; 1988, c. 891; 1992, c. 887.

Cross references.

For requirement that state agencies in preparing their reports, and the Department of Environmental Quality in conducting its review, consider the impact of projects on prime agricultural land, see § 3.2-204.

§ 10.1-1190.
Approval of Governor required for construction of facility.

The State Comptroller shall not authorize payments of funds from the state treasury for a major state project unless the request is accompanied by the written approval of the Governor after his consideration of the comments of the Department on the environmental impact of the facility.
This section shall not apply to funds appropriated by the General Assembly prior to June 1, 1973, or any reappropriation of such funds.

History.

1973, c. 384, § 10-17.110; 1974, c. 270, § 10.1-1210; 1977, c. 667; 1988, c. 891; 1991, c. 289; 1992, c. 887.

§ 10.1-1191.
Development of procedures, etc., for administration of chapter.

The Department shall, in conjunction with other state agencies, coordinate the development of objectives, criteria and procedures to ensure the orderly preparation and evaluation of environmental impact reports required by this article.
These procedures shall provide for submission of impact statements in sufficient time to permit any modification of the major state project which may be necessitated because of environmental impact.

History.

1973, c. 384, § 10-17.111; 1974, c. 270, § 10.1-1211; 1977, c. 667; 1988, c. 891; 1992, c. 887.

§ 10.1-1192.
Cooperation of state agencies.

All departments, commissions, boards, authorities, agencies, offices and institutions within any branch of the state government shall cooperate with the Department in carrying out the purposes of this article.

History.

1973, c. 384, § 10-17.112; 1974, c. 270, § 10.1-1212; 1977, c. 667; 1988, c. 891; 1992, c. 887.